Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Chapter 5. Group Insurance Program.
§ 51.1-511.
Persons entitled to payment of insurance on employee’s death.

Any amount of group life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance in force on any employee at the date of his death shall be paid, upon the establishment of a valid claim therefor, to the beneficiary designated by the employee under the provisions of the Virginia Retirement System or other retirement system administered by the Board, unless the employee has designated and filed with the Board on a form prepared by the Board, a different beneficiary of his group life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance. If no beneficiary has been designated by the employee, or if the death of the designated person occurs prior to the death of the member and another designation has not been made, the proceeds shall be paid to the persons surviving at the date of his death, in the same order of precedence as set forth in subsection A of §

51.1-162

.

Payment which otherwise would be made to the estate of an employee may be made in accordance with the provisions of §

64.2-601

or

64.2-602

.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:10; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832; 2002, c. 313; 2010, c. 269.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “64.1-132.2 or 64.1-132.3” was changed to “64.2-601 or

64.2-602

” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 313, in the last sentence in the first paragraph, inserted “or if the death of the designated person occurs prior to the death of the member and another designation has not been made” and substituted “in the same order of precedence as set forth in subsection A of §

51.1-162

” for “in the following order of precedence”; and deleted the second through sixth paragraphs, which enumerated the order of precedence for payment of proceeds.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 269 substituted “64.1-132.2 or 64.1-132.3” for “51.1-164” in the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (2006).

§ 51.1-512.
Optional life insurance.

The Board shall, under the terms and conditions specified by the Board, make available to each active insured employee optional life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance in incremental additional amounts not to exceed a maximum amount determined by the Board. Such maximum shall be reviewed at least once every five calendar years by the actuary of the Virginia Retirement System and increased by the Board upon the recommendation of the actuary. The amount recommended by the actuary shall be based upon the annual increases in the United States Average Consumer Price Index for all items, all urban consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.

The optional life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance shall be made available to each active insured employee under conditions prescribed by the Board. The conditions prescribed by the Board shall provide that offering the optional insurance does not materially increase the rates for any group life insurance policy provided pursuant to §

51.1-505

.

All optional insurance on an employee shall cease upon the earlier of (i) the date the employee’s basic coverage ceases or (ii) the date insurance being continued in retirement terminates pursuant to subsections D and E.

The optional amount of life insurance in force on an employee who retires for disability on an immediate retirement allowance may be continued, subject to payment of any required premium by the employee, during continuance of such disability but not beyond the end of the month in which the employee attains his “normal retirement date” as defined in §

51.1-124.3

.

The optional amount of life insurance in force on an employee who retires for service on an immediate retirement allowance, or for an employee who retired for disability on an immediate retirement allowance and who attains his “normal retirement date” as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, may be continued provided the retiree was continuously insured under this section for a period of at least 60 continuous months prior to retirement, or prior to reaching his “normal retirement date” as defined in §

51.1-124.3

for a disability retirement. This continued insurance shall be in incremental amounts not to exceed a maximum amount determined by the Board and the amounts and corresponding maximum coverage shall reduce beginning at the employee’s “normal retirement date” as defined in § 51.1-124.3, as determined by the Board. This maximum coverage amount shall be reviewed at least once every five calendar years as provided for under subsection A. The life insurance continued under this subsection shall cease upon the earliest of (i) the date the retiree attains age 80, (ii) lapse for nonpayment of premium, or (iii) return to employment and eligibility for active employee life insurance under Chapter 5 (§

51.1-500

et seq.) of Title 51.1. All accidental death and dismemberment insurance shall cease at retirement.

The cost of the optional insurance shall be determined periodically by the Board on the basis it considers appropriate. The Board may discontinue the optional insurance plan at any time upon determination that employee participation is not sufficient to continue the plan on a sound actuarial basis.

The amount of optional life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance in force on any employee at the date of his death shall be paid as provided in this chapter.

The Board shall determine the form and content of the accounting reports to be made by the insurance company with respect to the optional insurance. Any expenses incurred by the Retirement System for operating and administering the optional insurance programs provided in this section may be recovered by the Board from the advance premium deposit reserve required by subsection B of §

51.1-514

.

History.

1980, c. 643, § 51-111.67:12.1; 1990, c. 832; 1995, c. 360; 1997, c. 273; 2001, c. 696; 2005, c. 57; 2006, c. 252; 2010, c. 751; 2012, c. 696.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 696, in subsection A, substituted “by the Board” for “in this chapter,” deleted “up to four times the employee’s annual salary” following “incremental amounts,” substituted “reviewed every even calendar year by the actuary of the Virginia Retirement System and increased by the Board upon the recommendation of the actuary. The amount recommended by the actuary shall be” for “increased every other calendar year, beginning January 1, 1998, to an amount recommended by the actuary of the Virginia Retirement System,” and deleted the last two sentences, which formerly read: “If an employee’s annual salary is not an even multiple of $1,000, his annual salary for purposes of this section shall be considered to be the next higher $1,000. For purposes of this section and §

51.1-512.1

, the annual salary of a member of the General Assembly and for an employee retired for service or disability on an immediate retirement allowance shall be determined as provided in §

51.1-505

”; deleted the last sentence of subsection B, which formerly read: “Optional amounts of insurance shall not be made available to any employee retired for service”; divided former subsection C into present subsections C and D; in subsection C, substituted “earlier of (i)” for “earliest of (i) the date the employee retires for service or,” and inserted “or (ii) the date insurance being continued in retirement terminates pursuant to subsections D and E” at the end thereof; deleted former subsection D, which formerly read: “During any period in which an active employee has the optional insurance in force, the full cost thereof shall be withheld from his salary. During any period in which an employee continues optional life insurance after retiring for disability on an immediate retirement allowance, the full cost thereof shall be withheld from his retirement allowance”; added present subsection E; redesignated former subsections E through G as present subsections F through H; and deleted “On or after July 1, 1998” following “considers appropriate” in subsection F.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 57, in subsection A, substituted “$600,000” for “$500,000” in the first sentence; “at least once every five calendar years” for “every even calendar year” in the second sentence; in subsection E, substituted “65” for “sixty-five” throughout, “60” for “sixty” in the first sentence; and substituted
“80” for “eighty” in the third sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 252 substituted “at least once every five calendar years” for “every even calendar year” in the third sentence in subsection E.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 751 substituted “maximum amount determined by the Board” for “total of $600,000 of additional insurance” at the end of the first sentence in subsection A; and substituted “a maximum amount determined by the Board” for “$200,000” in the second sentence of subsection E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 696 substituted “his ‘normal retirement date’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

” for “age 65” in subsection D and in two places in subsection E; and substituted “the employee’s ‘normal retirement date’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

” for “age 65” in the second sentence of subsection E.

§ 51.1-512.1.
Optional life insurance for the spouse and minor dependents of employees.

The Board shall, under the terms and conditions specified by the Board, make available to any active insured employee optional life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance on the employee’s spouse and minor dependents in the following amounts:

For the spouse of an active insured employee: an amount up to 50 percent of the maximum amount of optional insurance available to the employee under §

51.1-512

.

For any minor dependent of an active insured employee in increments specified by the Board. The Board shall adjust these amounts periodically to account for changes in the purchasing power of money over time.

All optional insurance on an employee’s spouse shall cease upon the earliest of (i) the date the employee’s basic coverage ceases, (ii) the entry of a final divorce decree terminating the marriage of the employee and the employee’s spouse, or (iii) the date the insurance being continued in retirement terminates pursuant to subsections C and D. All optional insurance on an employee’s minor dependent shall cease upon the earliest of (a) the minor dependent attains the age of 21, unless the minor dependent is a full-time student at an institution of higher education, then age 25 or unless the minor dependent is under a mental or physical disability, in which event coverage shall not terminate until three months following cessation of the disability, (b) marriage of the minor dependent, or (c) the date the employee’s basic coverage ceases.

Subject to foregoing limitations, the optional amount of life insurance in force on the spouse or minor dependent of an employee who retires for disability on an immediate retirement allowance may be continued, subject to payment of any required premium by the employee, during continuance of such disability but not beyond the end of the month in which the employee’s normal retirement date occurs.

Subject to the foregoing limitations, the optional amount of life insurance in force on the spouse or minor dependent of an employee who retires for service on an immediate retirement allowance, or for an employee who retired for disability on an immediate retirement allowance when his normal retirement date occurs, may be continued, subject to payment of any required premium by the employee, and provided the employee had such spouse or dependent insurance for a period of at least 60 continuous months prior to retirement, or prior to reaching normal retirement date for a disability retirement. Life insurance on the spouse that is eligible to be continued shall be an amount specified by the Board and available to the retiree under §

51.1-512

and shall begin to reduce when the retiree’s normal retirement date occurs under the terms and conditions specified by the Board. Life insurance on dependent children that is eligible to be continued shall be in increments as specified by the Board. The Board shall adjust these amounts periodically to account for changes in the purchasing power of money over time. All optional life insurance on a retiree’s spouse or dependent ceases at the earliest of (i) the retiree attaining age 80, (ii) the death of the retiree, (iii) for a spouse, the entry of a final divorce decree terminating the marriage of the retiree and the retiree’s spouse, (iv) for a minor insured dependent, the date the dependent attains the age of 21, unless the minor insured dependent is a full-time college student, then the date the dependent attains age 25, unless the minor insured dependent is under a mental or physical disability, in which case coverage shall not terminate until three months following cessation of the disability, or (v) for a minor insured dependent, the date of his marriage. All accidental death and dismemberment insurance ceases at retirement.

The cost of the optional insurance shall be determined periodically by the Board on the basis it considers appropriate. The Board may discontinue the optional insurance plan at any time upon determination that employee participation is not sufficient to continue the plan on a sound actuarial basis.

The amount of optional life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance in force on an employee’s spouse or minor dependent at the date of his or her death shall be paid as provided in this chapter. All accidental death and dismemberment insurance ceases at retirement. The amount of optional life insurance in force on the retiree’s spouse or minor dependent at the date of his death shall be paid as provided in this chapter.

The Board shall determine the form and content of the accounting reports to be made by the insurance company with respect to the optional insurance. Any expenses incurred by the Retirement System for operating and administering the optional insurance programs provided in this section may be recovered by the Board from the advance premium deposit reserve required by subsection B of §

51.1-514

.

As used in this section, an employee’s “minor dependent” means a child member of the employee’s or retiree’s family who is eligible for coverage under the family membership program offered under policies and procedures of the Department of Human Resource Management governing health insurance plans administered pursuant to §

2.2-1204

or

2.2-2818

.

The provisions of this chapter applicable to the provision of group insurance policies to insure eligible employees or retirees shall apply to optional insurance insuring the spouses and minor dependents of eligible employees or retirees pursuant to this section, with the respective differences having been considered.

History.

1995, c. 360; 1997, c. 273; 2000, cc. 66, 657; 2001, c. 696; 2011, c. 880.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in subsection B, substituted “student at an institution of higher education” for “college student”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 66 and 657 were identical, and substituted “Human Resource Management” for “Personnel and Training” in subsection H.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 696, in subsection A, substituted “by the Board” for “in this chapter” in the introductory language, and substituted “in increments specified by the Board” for “$5,000, $10,000, or $15,000” in subdivision 2; deleted former subsection B, which formerly read: “The optional life, accidental death, and dismemberment insurance on the employee’s spouse and minor dependents shall be made available for purchase by each active insured employee under conditions prescribed by the Board”; redesignated the first paragraph of former subsection C as present subsection B; in subsection B, substituted “(i)” for “(i) the date the employee retires from service, (ii),” substituted “(ii)” for “or (iii),” and inserted “or (iii) the date the insurance being continued in retirement terminates pursuant to subsections C and D” in the first sentence, substituted “(i)” for “(i) the date the employee retires for service, (ii),” and substituted “(ii)” for “(iii)” and “(iii)” for “(iv)” in the second sentence; substituted present subsection D for former subsection D, which formerly read: “During any period in which an active employee has optional insurance in force on the employee’s spouse or minor dependent, the full cost thereof shall be withheld from the employee’s salary. During any period in which an employee continues optional life insurance on the employee’s spouse or minor dependent after retiring for disability on an immediate retirement allowance, the full cost thereof shall be withheld from the employee’s retirement allowance”; deleted “On or after July 1, 1998” at the beginning of the second sentence of subsection E; added the last two sentences in subsection F; and inserted “or retiree’s” in subsections H and I.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 880, redesignated clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c) in the last sentence of subsection B; substituted “employee’s normal retirement date occurs” for “employee attains age sixty-five” in subsection C; and in subsection D, substituted “when his normal retirement date occurs” for “who attains age sixty-five,” “normal retirement date” for “age sixty-five,” and “retiree’s normal retirement date occurs” for “retiree attains age sixty-five.”

§ 51.1-513.
Repealed by Acts 1998, c. 774.

§ 51.1-513.1.
Long-term care insurance.

The Department of Human Resource Management is authorized to develop, implement, and administer a long-term care insurance program. The program shall be coordinated with any disability, life, or other insurance program administered under this title. The Department of Human Resource Management is authorized to contract for and purchase such coverage or use other actuarially sound funding necessary to effectuate this provision.

History.

1999, c. 5; 2000, cc. 66, 657.

Cross references.

As to long-term care insurance program for employees of local governments, local officers, and teachers, see §

2.2-1207

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 66 and 657 were identical, and substituted “Human Resource Management” for “Personnel and Training” in the first and third sentences.

§ 51.1-513.2.
Long-term care coverage program.

The Board shall maintain and administer a long-term care coverage or similar benefit program for any state employee working an average of at least 20 hours per week, and for any other person who has five or more years of creditable service with any retirement plan administered by the Virginia Retirement System. The long-term care coverage program may also extend coverage to eligible family members of such state employee or other person. The Board is authorized to contract for and purchase insurance coverage or to use other actuarially sound funding necessary to effectuate this provision. Participation in the long-term care coverage program shall be voluntary, subject to policies and procedures adopted by the Board.

Any person eligible to participate in the long-term care coverage program pursuant to §

51.1-513.3

will not be eligible for this plan.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Board may self-insure long-term care benefits provided under §

51.1-513.2

or

51.1-513.3

in accordance with the standards set forth in §

51.1-124.30

.

History.

2008, c. 568; 2011, c. 722; 2018, cc. 53, 305.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 722, in subsection A, rewrote the first sentence, added the second and last sentences.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 53 and 305 are identical, and inserted “or similar benefit” in the first sentence of subsection A.

§ 51.1-513.3.
Long-term care insurance program for employees of local governments, local officers, and teachers.

The Board shall maintain and administer a plan or plans, hereinafter “plan” or “plans,” for providing long-term care coverage or a similar benefit program for employees of local governments, local officers, and teachers. The plan or plans may also extend coverage to eligible family members of such employees of local governments, local officers, or teachers. The plan or plans may, but need not, be rated separately from any plan developed to provide long-term care coverage for state employees under §

51.1-513.2

. Participation in such insurance plan or plans shall be (i) voluntary, (ii) approved by the participant’s respective governing body, or by the local school board in the case of teachers, and (iii) subject to policies and procedures adopted by the Board.

For the purposes of this section:“Employees of local governments” shall include all officers and employees, working an average of at least 20 hours per week, of the governing body of any county, city, or town, and the directing or governing body of any political entity, subdivision, branch or unit of the Commonwealth or of any commission or public authority or body corporate created by or under an act of the General Assembly specifying the power or powers, privileges or authority capable of exercise by the commission or public authority or body corporate, as distinguished from §

15.2-1300

or

15.2-1303

or similar statutes, provided that the officers and employees of a social services department; welfare board; community services board or behavioral health authority; or library board of a county, city, or town shall be deemed to be employees of local government.“Local officer” means the treasurer, registrar, commissioner of the revenue, attorney for the Commonwealth, clerk of a circuit court, sheriff, or constable of any county or city or deputies or employees, working an average of at least 20 hours per week, of any of the preceding local officers.“Teacher” means any employee of a county, city, or other local public school board working an average of at least 20 hours per week.

History.

2008, c. 568; 2011, c. 722; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2018, cc. 53, 305.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 722, in subsection A, rewrote the first sentence and added the second sentence; in subsection B, inserted “working an average of at least 20 hours per week” in the definitions of “Employees of local governments,” “Local officer,” and “Teacher.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subsection B, in the paragraph defining “Employees of local governments,” substituted “community services board or behavioral health authority” for “mental health, mental retardation and substance abuse services board.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 53 and 305 are identical, and inserted “or a similar benefit program” in the first sentence of subsection A; and in the definition of “Employees of local governments” in subsection B, substituted “from §

15.2-1300

or

15.2-1303

or similar” for “from §

15.2-1300

,

15.2-1303

, or similar.”

§ 51.1-513.4.
Trust fund for long-term care programs.

The Board is authorized to establish a trust fund in connection with the long-term care insurance programs administered under §§

51.1-513.2

and

51.1-513.3

. The costs incurred by the Board in administering such long-term care insurance programs including the provision of case management and cost containment programs, shall be withdrawn from time to time by the Board from the trust fund. Any trust fund established by the Board under this section shall be deemed a separate and independent trust fund, shall be segregated from all other funds of the Commonwealth, and shall be invested and administered solely in the interests of the participants and beneficiaries thereof. Neither the General Assembly nor any public officer, employee, or agency shall use or authorize the use of such trust funds for any purpose other than as provided in law for benefits, refunds, and administrative expenses, including but not limited to legislative oversight of the long-term care insurance programs administered under §§

51.1-513.2

and

51.1-513.3

.

History.

2008, c. 568.

§ 51.1-514.
Policies to provide for accounting to Board; advance premium deposit reserve.

Each policy purchased by the Board shall provide for an accounting to the Board not later than 120 days after the end of each policy year. The accounting shall include (i) the amounts of premiums actually accrued under the policy during the policy year, (ii) the total amount of all mortality and other claim charges incurred during the policy year, and (iii) the amounts of the insurer’s expenses and risk charges for the policy year.

Any portion of the excess of the total of item (i) over the sum of items (ii) and (iii) may, with the approval of the Board, be held by the insurance company in an advance premium deposit reserve to be used by the company for charges under the policy only. Any expenses incurred by the Board on behalf of the group insurance program may be deducted from the advance premium deposit reserve. The advance premium deposit reserve shall bear interest at a rate to be determined in advance of each policy year by the insurance company. The rate shall be subject to Board approval as being consistent with the rates generally used by the company for similar funds held under other group life insurance policies. Any portion of the excess not held by the insurance company shall be held by the Board to be used for charges under the policy only. If the Board determines that the advance premium deposit reserve, together with any portion of the excess accumulated and held by the Board, has attained an amount estimated to make satisfactory provision for adverse fluctuations in future charges under the policy, any further excess shall inure to the benefit of the Commonwealth and other employers participating in the group insurance program as determined by the Board.

For purposes of this section, the insurance company may combine and consolidate the policies issued by it as directed by the Board.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.67:7; 1970, c. 476; 1973, c. 523; 1978, c. 841; 1983, c. 457; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 700; 1997, c. 273.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1991, c. 700, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides that in addition to applying prospectively, the 1991 act shall apply retroactively to provide life, accidental death and dismemberment insurance for any officer or employee of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth who, at the time of enactment or prior to the time of enactment, but subsequent to Aug. 1, 1990, was engaged in federally funded active military duty.